Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2106
Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards; established; members; number; appointment; qualifications; compensation; expenses.

(1) There is hereby established the Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards which shall consist of eleven members to be appointed by the Governor with the approval of the Legislature. Any member serving on the Board of Examiners of County Highway and City Street Superintendents on June 30, 2026, shall be presumptively eligible to serve on the Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards without meeting the criteria of subsections (2) through (6) of this section. Any presumptively eligible member shall serve for a term of four years from the date when he or she became a member of the board and may be reappointed by the Governor. The board shall assist in developing the functional classification system under sections 39-2101 to 39-2125 and shall have sole responsibility for overseeing the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act.

(2) Of the members of such board:

(a) Two shall be representatives of the Department of Transportation;

(b) Three shall be representatives of the counties. One of such members shall be a county highway superintendent licensed pursuant to the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act, and two of such members shall be county board members;

(c) Three shall be representatives of the municipalities. One of such members shall be a city street superintendent licensed pursuant to the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act, and the remaining representatives of municipalities shall be a city engineer, village engineer, public works director, city manager, city administrator, street commissioner, or city street superintendent licensed pursuant to the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act; and

(d) Three shall be lay citizens, with one representing each of the three congressional districts of the state.

(3) The county members on the board shall represent the various classes of counties, as defined in section 23-1114.01, in the following manner:

(a) One shall be a representative from either a Class 1 or Class 2 county;

(b) One shall be a representative from either a Class 3 or Class 4 county; and

(c) One shall be a representative from either a Class 5, Class 6, or Class 7 county.

(4) The municipal members of the board shall represent municipalities of the following sizes by population, as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census:

(a) One shall be a representative from a municipality of less than two thousand five hundred inhabitants;

(b) One shall be a representative from a municipality of two thousand five hundred to fifty thousand inhabitants; and

(c) One shall be a representative from a municipality of over fifty thousand inhabitants.

(5) In making such appointments, the Governor shall consult with the Director-State Engineer and with the appropriate county and municipal officials and may consult with organizations representing such officials or representing counties or municipalities as may be appropriate.

(6) At the expiration of the existing term, one member from the county representatives, the municipal representatives, and the lay citizens shall be appointed for a term of two years; and two members from the county representatives, the municipal representatives, and the lay citizens shall be appointed for terms of four years. One representative from the department shall be appointed for a two-year term and the other representative shall be appointed for a four-year term. Thereafter, all such appointments shall be for terms of four years each.

(7) If the Legislature is not in session when members of the board are appointed by the Governor, such members shall take office and act as recess appointees until the next meeting of the Legislature.

(8) Members of such board shall receive no compensation for their services as such, except that the lay members shall receive the same compensation as members of the State Highway Commission, and all members shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. All expenses of such board shall be paid by the department.

Laws 1969, c. 312, § 6, p. 1122;

Laws 1971, LB 100, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 61;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 43;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 147;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 28;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 20;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 16.
July 1, 2026
County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act, see section 39-2301.